test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-autt_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - autt â-stem : # Noun 'car/auto' - full paradigm
     autt+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: autt
     autt+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: aaut
     autt+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: aaut
     autt+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: auʹtte
     autt+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: aautâst
     autt+N+Sg+Com+Indef: aautin
     autt+N+Ess+Indef: auttân
     autt+N+Par+Indef: auttâd
     autt+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [auttaa, auttää]
     autt+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: aaut
     autt+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: aauti
     autt+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: aautid
     autt+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: aautid
     autt+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: aautin
     autt+N+Pl+Com+Indef: aautivuiʹm
     autt+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [aautitaa, aautitää]
     autt+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: aautâž
